Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.030

Certain school districts—Election to authorize division in school districts not already divided into directors' districts.

The board of directors of every first-class school district other than a school district of the first class having within its boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or more which is not divided into directors' districts may submit to the voters at any regular school district election a proposition to authorize the board of directors to divide the district into directors' districts or for second-class school districts into director districts or a combination of no fewer than three director districts and no more than two at large positions. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition is affirmative, the board of directors shall proceed to divide the district into directors' districts following the procedure established in RCW 29A.76.010. Such director districts, if approved, shall not become effective until the next regular school election when a new five member board of directors shall be elected, one from each of the director districts from among the residents of the respective director district, or from among the residents of the entire school district in the case of directors at large, by the electors of the entire district, two for a term of two years and three for a term of four years, unless such district elects its directors for six years, in which case, one for a term of two years, two for a term of four years, and two for a term of six years.

[ 2015 c 53 s 10. Prior: 1991 c 363 s 23; 1991 c 288 s 4; 1990 c 161 s 6; 1985 c 385 s 28; 1979 ex.s. c 183 s 3; 1975 c 43 s 9; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 3; 1971 c 67 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.344; prior: 1959 c 268 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.315.590, 28A.57.344, 28.57.344.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 183: See notes following RCW 28A.343.020.

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.